Utah statutes.
77-23-105.   Failure to stop -- Criminal liability.
Any person who intentionally and knowingly passes, without stopping as
required, any administrative traffic checkpoint operated under the authority
of a magistrate as provided in Section 77-23-104 is guilty of a class B
misdemeanor.
